District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

21-1901

Petition for appointment of receiver, where absentees interested in property; Corporation Counsel as party

Repealed.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 3, 34 DCR 632

History

1981 Ed., §§ 21-1901 to 21-1915.

Prior Codifications